Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF HEALTH; JOIN WORLD HEALTH ORGANIZATION GLOBAL OUTBREAK ALERT AND RESPONSE NETWORK.new text end new text begin By September 1, 2026, the commissioner of health must identify the process required for the Minnesota Department of Health to apply to join the World Health Organization Global Outbreak Alert and Response Network (GOARN). By December 1, 2026, the commissioner must take steps necessary for the Minnesota Department of Health to apply to join GOARN. new text end